Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 6.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-1006
Approved project, defined.

Approved project
means any project that is certified by a municipality under the Nebraska Advantage
Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 6.